Utah statutes.
31A-8a-202.   Commissioner to issue license -- Renewals.

(1)  The commissioner may issue a license to a person:

(a)  who files an application and pays the fee in accordance with Section 31A-8a-201; and

(b)  who the commissioner determines is in compliance with this chapter.

(2) (a)  A license issued under this chapter is valid until the immediately following December 31 and may be renewed in accordance with Subsection (2)(b).

(b)  A license may be renewed if:

(i)  the commissioner finds that the person operating the health discount program is in compliance with this chapter;

(ii)  the health discount program operator or health discount program marketer submits the appropriate renewal application and pays any applicable fees for renewal; and

(iii)  the health discount program certifies that the information in the application for renewal is accurate.



Amended by Chapter 135, 2013 General Session

